Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Manchester, NH|June 30, 2016

I didnt even know Mike endorsed me, but I didnt even know Mike endorsed me, but I didnt even know Mike endorsed me, but Ill take it. We have a lot of - Ill take it. We have a lot of - Ill take it. We have a lot of endorsements. Ill tell you that the endorsements, Ill tell you that the endorsements, Ill tell you that the voters are our biggest endorsement.
We voters are our biggest endorsement. We voters are our biggest endorsement. We have a lot of endorsers. So thank you. Have a lot of endorsers. So thank you have a lot of endorsers, so thank you, Mike, and well get things moving and Mike and well get things moving and Mike and well get things moving and well get them changed.
So this is the - well get them changed. So this is the - well get them changed. So this is the Sylvania where it closed its plant, they Sylvania where it closed its plant, they Sylvania where it closed its plant, they closed the plant, 139 workers went to closed, the plant 139 workers went to closed, the plant 139 workers went to Mexico.
They also went to China, that was Mexico. They also went to China, that was Mexico. They also went to China that was in 2014. And heres what you have right in 2014 and heres what you have right in 2014 and heres what you have right now. You have Rockwell, some of the people, now you have Rockwell, some of the people, now you have Rockwell, some of the people that moved out of just this area in New that moved out of just this area in New that moved out of just this area in New Hampshire, you have Rockwell Automation Hampshire, you have Rockwell Automation Hampshire, you have Rockwell Automation Inc.
It close its plant, 170 workers moved Inc. It close its plant, 170 workers moved Inc. It close its plant 170 workers moved in this case all to Mexico. That was in, in this case all to Mexico that was in, in this case all to Mexico that was in 2009. Ethan Allen interiors closed its 2009. Ethan Allen interiors closed its 2009 Ethan Allen interiors closed its plant, laid off 260 people.
The workers plant laid off 260 people, the workers plant laid off 260 people, the workers all moved to Mexico and it wasnt so all moved to Mexico and it wasnt so all moved to Mexico and it wasnt so much the workers. The workers stayed here much. The workers, the workers stayed here much, the workers, the workers stayed here for the most part people from Mexico for the most part people from Mexico for the most part people from Mexico took their jobs, took their jobs, took their jobs, Freudenberg not closed, its plant and Freudenberg not closed its plant and Freudenberg not closed its plant and laid off 120 workers.
They moved their laid off 120 workers. They moved their laid off 120 workers. They moved their jobs to Mexico in 2008. Risdon Ams jobs to Mexico in 2008 Risdon Ams jobs to Mexico. In 2008, Risdon Ams closed its plant, laid off 40 workers and closed its plant, laid off 40 workers and closed its plant, laid off 40 workers and moved their jobs to Mexico.
Regional job moved their jobs to Mexico, regional job moved their jobs to Mexico. Regional job losses have been fantastically poor, losses have been fantastically poor, losses have been fantastically poor, fantastically bad and disgraceful New fantastically, bad and disgraceful New fantastically bad and disgraceful New Hampshires lost 31 percent of their Hampshires lost 31 percent of their Hampshires lost 31 percent of Their manufacturing job since NAFTA just think manufacturing job since NAFTA just think manufacturing job since NAFTA. Just think of that 36 percent since China entered of that 36 percent since China entered of that 36 percent since China entered the World Trade Organization.
Thats a - the World Trade Organization, thats a - the World Trade Organization, thats a lot of jobs, thats a big chunk, almost lot of jobs, thats a big chunk, almost lot of jobs, thats a big chunk, almost 50 % of your manufacturing, Pennsylvania, 50 % of your manufacturing, Pennsylvania, 50 % of your manufacturing, Pennsylvania is lost, 36 percent of their is lost, 36 percent of their is lost, 36 percent of their manufacturing jobs since NAFTA and 34 manufacturing jobs since NAFTA and 34 manufacturing jobs since NAFTA and 34 percent since China entered the WTO. Ohio percent since China entered the WTO, Ohio percent since China entered the WTO, Ohio and remember Bill Clinton signed NAFTA and remember Bill Clinton signed NAFTA and remember Bill Clinton signed NAFTA. Just for those of you that have any - just for those of you that have any - just for those of you that have any questions, Bill Clinton signature, right questions, Bill Clinton signature, right questions, Bill Clinton signature, right on the bottom, Ohio lost 34 percent of - on the Bottom Ohio lost 34 percent of on the bottom, Ohio lost 34 percent of the manufacturing jobs since NAFTA, 32 the manufacturing jobs since NAFTA, 32. The manufacturing jobs since NAFTA 32 percent since China entered the WTO percent since China entered the WTO percent since China entered the WTO, another Clinton, another Clinton, another Clinton mein lost 39 percent of their mein lost 39 percent of their mein lost 39 percent of their manufacturing Job since NAFTA 39 percent manufacturing job since NAFTA, 39 percent manufacturing job since NAFTA 39 percent and 34 percent since China entered the and 34 percent since China entered the and 34 percent since China entered the WTO. So you know its just - its not very WTO. So you know, its just - its not very WTO. So you know its just - its not very hard to explain.
Its not very hard to, hard to explain. Its not very hard to, hard to explain. Its not very hard to understand what is difficult is to understand what is difficult is to understand what is difficult is to figure out why people did this, why you figure out why people did this, why you figure out why people did this, why you know we Have expansion plans in this know we have expansion plans in this know we have expansion plans in this country.
We have all sorts of plans, but country we have all sorts of plans, but country we have all sorts of plans, but theres no expansion. We have job losses, theres no expansion. We have job losses, theres no expansion. We have job losses and other countries have massive and other countries have massive and other countries have massive expansion.
We have 500 billion dollar expansion. We have 500 billion dollar expansion. We have 500 billion dollar trade deficit with China, massive trade trade deficit with China, massive trade trade deficit with China, massive trade deficits with Japan take a look at the deficits with Japan. Take a look at the deficits with Japan.
Take a look at the imbalance in trade between Japan and the imbalance in trade between Japan and the imbalance in trade between Japan and the United States. They send us millions of United States. They send us millions of United States. They send us millions of cars. We send them beef and you ought to cars, we send them beef and you ought to cars, we send them beef and you ought to take a look at a chart sometime and just take a look at a chart sometime and just take a look at a Chart sometime and just take a look at the difference between - take a look at the difference between - take a look at the difference between what we send them and what they send us, what we send them and what they send us, what we send them and what They send us Mexico and I respect Mexico, I respect Mexico and I respect Mexico.
I respect Mexico and I respect Mexico. I respect their leaders. What theyve done to us is their leaders. What theyve done to us is their leaders. What theyve done to us is incredible. Their leaders are so much incredible. Their leaders are so much incredible. Their leaders are so much smarter, so much sharper and its smarter so much sharper and its smarter so much sharper and its incredible.
In fact, that could be a incredible - in fact, that could be a incredible - in fact, that could be a Mexican plane up there. Theyre getting Mexican plane up there. Theyre getting Mexican plane up there. Theyre getting ready to attack. So thats the way it is ready to attack. So thats the way it is ready to attack.
So thats the way it is folks. I just want to say that this is a folks, I just want to say that this is a folks, I just want to say that this is a factory and the legacy really of Hillary factory and the legacy really of Hillary factory and the legacy really of Hillary Clinton and Bill Clinton, because this Clinton and Bill Clinton, because this Clinton and Bill Clinton, because this legacy is largely due and you could legacy is largely due and you could - legacy is largely due and you could actually say entirely due to NAFTA. The actually say entirely due to NAFTA, the actually say entirely due to NAFTA, the plant closed its doors and shipped its plant, closed its doors and shipped its plant, closed its doors and shipped its jobs to Mexico.
China. They did commercial jobs to Mexico, China. They did commercial jobs to Mexico, China, they did commercial lighting. There were very big companies, lighting, there were very big companies, lighting, there were very big companies to do business with them. The real to do business with them, the real to do business with them.
The real Clinton Global Initiative is their Clinton Global Initiative is their Clinton Global Initiative is their economic plan to ship Americas jobs economic plan to ship Americas jobs economic plan to ship Americas jobs overseas. Thats whats happening, whether overseas, thats whats happening, whether overseas, thats whats happening.
Whether we like it, whether we dont like it, its - we like it, whether we dont like it, its - we like it, whether we dont like it, its whats happening and everybody knows it, whats happening and everybody knows it, whats happening and everybody knows it. So youre looking here really at a plant, so youre looking here really at a plant.
So youre looking here really at a plant and the wreckage of NAFTA and the - and the wreckage of NAFTA and the - and the wreckage of NAFTA and the wreckage of Chinas entrance into the wreckage of Chinas entrance into the wreckage of Chinas entrance into the World Trade Organization Americas lost World Trade Organization, Americas lost World Trade Organization, Americas lost nearly 1/3 of its manufacturing jobs, nearly 1/3 of its manufacturing jobs, nearly 1/3 of its manufacturing jobs since 1997 since 1997 since 1997. This is America were talking about.
This is America were talking about. This is America were talking about since 1997, driven by these two Hillary since 1997, driven by these two Hillary since 1997 driven by these two Hillary Clinton understood and backed and Bill Clinton, understood and backed and Bill Clinton understood and backed and Bill Clinton.
Certainly as the presidents Clinton, certainly as the presidents Clinton, certainly as the presidents initiatives, they are a disaster and now initiatives, they are a disaster and now initiatives, they are a disaster and now they want to go into TPP trans-pacific, they want to go into TPP trans-pacific.
They want to go into TPP trans-pacific partnership that will make NAFTA in my partnership that will make NAFTA in my partnership that will make NAFTA in my opinion, look like a baby trans-pacific opinion, look like a baby trans-pacific opinion, look like a baby trans-pacific partnership. Its over 5,000 pages, long partnership.
Its over 5,000 pages, long partnership. Its over 5,000 pages long. Every country thats in that partnership, every country thats in that partnership. Every country thats in that partnership has studied every word, every comma, every has studied every word, every comma, every has studied every word, every comma, every sentence, every paragraph, our guys sentence, every paragraph, our guys sentence, every paragraph, our guys probably havent even read it.
This is probably - havent even read it. This is probably havent even read it. This is the way we do business. All you have to - the way we do business, all you have to - the way we do business, all you have to do is look at Obamacare, look at what do is look at Obamacare, look at what do is look at Obamacare, look at what passed, where Congress, The senators passed where Congress - the senators passed, where Congress the senators practically, nobody even read it, and now practically, nobody even read it.
And now practically, nobody even read it. And now do we have a mess with Obamacare? So the - do we have a mess with Obamacare? So the - do we have a mess with Obamacare, so the same thing is going on with TPP. Just same thing is going on with TPP. Just same thing is going on with TPP, just like Hillary Clinton pushed through the like Hillary Clinton pushed through the like Hillary Clinton pushed through the trade deal with South Korea that killed trade deal with South Korea that killed trade deal with South Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs and she pushed it another 100,000 jobs and she pushed it another 100,000 jobs and she pushed it through.
Look at what passed, where Congress the look at what passed, where Congress the look at what passed, where Congress, the Senate is practically nobody even read Senate is practically nobody even read Senate is practically nobody even read it and now do we have a mess with it. And now do we have a mess with it and now do we have a mess with Obamacare?
So the same thing is going on Obamacare. So the same thing is going on Obamacare. So the same thing is going on with TPP, just like Hillary Clinton with TPP. Just like Hillary Clinton with TPP, just like Hillary Clinton pushed through the trade deal with South, pushed through the trade deal with South, pushed through the trade deal with South Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs, Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs, Korea that killed another 100,000 jobs.
And she pushed it through after pledging and she pushed it through after pledging and she pushed it through after pledging she wouldnt. And she did pledge. She was - she wouldnt. And she did pledge. She was - she wouldnt. And she did pledge. She was not going to do that, but it happened, so not going to do that, but it happened.
So not going to do that, but it happened. So South Korea, not a big beneficiary and we - South Korea not a big beneficiary and we - South Korea not a big beneficiary and we protect them. We have 28,000 soldiers protect them. We have 28,000 soldiers protect them. We have 28,000 soldiers right now on the line between north and right now on the line between north and right now on the line between north and south.
And what happens, what happens if south and what happens, what happens if south and what happens? What happens if theres a war we get involved in the - theres a war we get involved in the - theres a war we get involved. In the meantime, theyre killing the son trade. Meantime, theyre killing the son trade.
Meantime, theyre killing the son trade, nothing against South Korea. I do a lot, nothing against South Korea. I do a lot nothing against South Korea. I do a lot of business with South Korea, how of business with South Korea, how of business with South Korea, how buildings over there. But honestly we buildings over there.
But honestly we buildings over there, but honestly we have to get smart folks. We cant have to get smart folks. We cant have to get smart folks. We cant continue to do this. They are an economic continue to do this. They are an economic continue to do this. They are an economic behemoth. We protect them, they dont behemoth, we protect them, they dont behemoth, we protect them.
They dont reimburse us for what its costing and reimburse us for what its costing and reimburse us for what its costing and were going to sue no. Twenty one. Were going to sue no. Twenty one. Were going to sue no twenty one trillion dollars as a country and our trillion dollars as a country and our trillion dollars as a country and our infrastructure is a mess and many of our infrastructure is a mess and many of our infrastructure is a mess and Many of our plants and factories are just like this, plants and factories are just like this.
Plants and factories are just like this, thats standing to the side of me, New thats standing to the side of me, New thats standing to the side of me. New Hampshire has lost 37 % of its Hampshire has lost, 37 % of its Hampshire has lost 37 % of its manufacturing jobs since China joined manufacturing jobs since China joined manufacturing jobs.
Since China joined the World Trade Organization and this the World Trade Organization and this the World Trade Organization and this was a deal that was very, very much was a deal that was very, very much was a deal that was very, very much pushed by Hillary Clinton. Today, our pushed by Hillary Clinton today, our pushed by Hillary Clinton.
Today our manufacturing trade deficit with the manufacturing trade deficit with the manufacturing trade deficit with the world is nearly 800 billion dollars. So world is nearly 800 billion dollars. So world is nearly 800 billion dollars. So we have a trade deficit, we trade, we have - we have a trade deficit, we trade, we have - we have a trade deficit.
We trade, we have a deficit of eight hundred billion, a deficit of eight hundred billion, a deficit of eight hundred billion dollars. Nothing new, in fact, its amazing dollars, nothing new. In fact, its amazing dollars, nothing new. In fact, its amazing that for years weve had massive that for years weve had massive that for years weve had massive deficits.
Now its getting higher, its deficits now its getting higher. Its deficits now, its getting higher, its getting worse. These countries are getting worse. These countries are getting worse. These countries are treating us like were children because treating us like were children because treating us like were children because we have leaders that dont know whats - we have leaders that dont know whats - we have leaders that dont know whats going on.
The trade deficit was only going on, the trade deficit was only going on. The trade deficit was only eighty four billion when Bill Clinton eighty four billion when Bill Clinton eighty four billion when Bill Clinton was first inaugurated. So weve taken it was first inaugurated. So weve taken - it was first inaugurated, so weve taken it from 84 billion, which is a lot of money from 84 billion, which is a lot of money from 84 billion, which is a lot of money to now eight hundred billion dollars and to now eight hundred Billion dollars and to now eight hundred billion dollars and going up going up fast unless I become going up going up fast unless I become going up going up fast.
Unless I become president, you will see a drop like president, you will see a drop like president. You will see a drop like youve never seen. Youve never seen - youve never seen - you feel youll never see goofy and you feel youll never see goofy and you feel youll never see goofy. And dont forget when our factories closed, dont forget when our factories closed, dont forget when our factories closed, the nearby businesses suffer and you see the nearby businesses suffer and you see the nearby businesses suffer.
And you see that in this here. You see that in every - that in this, here you see that in every - that in this here you see that in every year a look at New York State year, a look at New York State year, a look at New York State. I wonder, York stayed in a massive - I wonder York stayed in a massive. I wonder York stayed in a massive landslide and I went around and toured landslide.
And I went around and toured landslide. And I went around and toured it. Im from there. But I had no idea when it - Im from there, but I had no idea when it - Im from there. But I had no idea when you go upstate, when you go out to parts, you go upstate. When you go out to parts, you go upstate. When you go out to parts of Long Island Suffolk, Suffolk County of Long Island, Suffolk, Suffolk County of Long Island, Suffolk, Suffolk County, its incredible.
When you take a look at, its incredible when you take a look at, its incredible. When you take a look at the devastation, when you take a look at the devastation, when you take a look at the devastation, when you take a look at the devastation that took place in New - the devastation that took place in New - the devastation that took place In New York and Pennsylvania and Connecticut, York and Pennsylvania and Connecticut, York and Pennsylvania and Connecticut, Connecticuts a great state.
I love Connecticuts a great state. I love Connecticuts a great state. I love Connecticut devastation caused mostly by Connecticut devastation caused mostly by Connecticut devastation caused mostly by NAFTA because mostly by companies moving NAFTA because mostly by companies moving NAFTA because mostly by companies moving out of Connecticut and New York and out of Connecticut and New York.
And out of Connecticut and New York and Pennsylvania and Maryland by the way and Pennsylvania and Maryland by the way and Pennsylvania and Maryland by the way and Rhode Island, Rhode Island, Rhode Island, I had these all at one time and Delaware, I had these all at One time and Delaware, I had these all at one time and Delaware and we won every single county of every and we won every single county of every and we won every single county of every single state.
Massive victories because I single state massive victories because I single state massive victories because I understand the problem and its about understand the problem and its about understand the problem and its about jobs, its about protection, its about jobs, its about protection, its about jobs, its about Protection, its about stopping Isis.
Its about a lot of things stopping Isis. Its about a lot of things stopping Isis. Its about a lot of things, but its also heavily about jobs and - but its also heavily about jobs and - but its also heavily about jobs and were going to change it and were going - were going to change it and were going - were going to change it and Were going to get it changed fast that I can tell to get it changed fast that I can tell to get it changed fast that I can tell you and I can promise you that when you - you and I can promise you that when you you and I can promise you that when you have large numbers of unemployed have large numbers of unemployed have large numbers of unemployed blue-collar workers, incomes go down, blue-collar workers, incomes go down, blue-collar workers, incomes go down across the country just across the - across the country just across the - Across the country, just across the entire country, entire country, entire country and it affects so many other businesses and it affects so many other businesses and it affects so many other businesses when a plant like this closes, it just when a plant like this closes it just When a plant like this closes, it just affects so much and so many other people affects so much and so many other people affects so much and so many other people, so many other lives and so many other so many other lives and so many other.
So many other lives and so many other businesses when you force workers in businesses, when you force workers in businesses, when you force workers in America to compete with workers earning America to compete with workers earning America to compete with workers earning $ 1 a day overseas. Our whole standard of $ 1 a day overseas, our whole standard of $ 1 a day overseas, our whole standard of living goes down.
We have workers for 18, living goes down, we have workers for 18, living goes down, we have workers for 18 years. They havent received an increase years. They havent received an increase years. They havent received an increase. Their real wages are lower now than they - their real wages are lower now than they - their real wages are lower now than they were 18 years ago.
Theyre working longer were 18 years ago, theyre working longer were 18 years ago. Theyre working longer hours. Theyre working harder. They have hours, theyre working harder. They have hours, theyre working harder. They have jobs that they dont like as much and jobs that they dont like as much and jobs that they dont like as much and they make it less money and there are - they make it less money and there are - they make it less money and there Are people in the audience dont raise your people in the audience, dont raise your people in the audience, dont raise your hand.
I dont want to embarrass you but hand - I dont want to embarrass you but hand I dont want to embarrass you. But there are people in the audience that there are people in the audience that there are people in the audience that are exactly in that position. And you are exactly in that position and you are exactly in that position.
And you know a lot of people say, well, they make know a lot of people say, well, they make know a lot of people say well, they make the goods cheaper well by the time they the goods cheaper well by the time they the goods cheaper well By the time they manufacture them and send, manufacture them and send, manufacture them and send the transportation is very expensive and the transportation is very expensive and the transportation is very expensive and all of these other things, were better all of these other things.
Were better all of these other things. Were better paying a little bit more and having jobs paying a little bit more and having jobs paying a little bit more and having jobs so much better system the way it used to so much better system the way it used to so much better system. The way it used to be be be we manufacture goods and we then sell, we manufacture goods and we then sell, we manufacture goods and we then sell those goods to other countries.
But we those goods to other countries, but we those goods to other countries. But we sell them to other countries and a lot sell them to other countries and a lot sell them to other countries. And a lot of people say, oh, well, the goods will be of people say, oh, well, the goods will be of people say, oh, well, the goods will be cheaper.
Theyll come in, theyll be cheaper. Theyll come in, theyll be cheaper. Theyll come in, theyll be cheaper. Yeah, but we lost all our jobs, so cheaper, yeah, but we lost all our jobs. So cheaper, yeah, but we lost all our jobs. So a better offer than not quite as cheap a better offer than not quite as cheap, a better offer than not quite as cheap.
And the goods will also be of a higher and the goods will also be of a higher. And the goods will also be of a higher quality because we do a higher quality quality because we do a higher quality quality because we do a higher quality good and were known for that. But all of good and were known for that.
But all of good and were known for that, but all of a sudden the jobs are gone and frankly a sudden the jobs are gone and frankly a sudden the jobs are gone and frankly the goods can come in cheaply, the people, the goods can come in Cheaply the people the goods can come in cheaply, the people dont have any money to buy him, so dont have any money to buy him.
So dont have any money to buy him. So thats a problem, is that right? So we - thats a problem is that right? So we - thats a problem is that right. So we became the richest economy in the world, became the richest economy in the world, became the richest economy in the world with the biggest middle class in the - with the biggest middle class in the - with the biggest middle class in the world.
By becoming the biggest producer world by becoming the biggest producer world by becoming the biggest producer, the biggest producer in the world, the - the biggest producer in the world, the the biggest producer in the world, the wealth this created was shared all wealth. This created was shared all wealth.
This created was shared all across our nation then came the era of across our nation then came the era of across our nation then came the era of surging trade deficits. Everyone wanted surging trade deficits. Everyone wanted surging trade deficits. Everyone wanted to go out and lets go and our to go out and lets go and our to go out and lets go and our government made it possible so easy.
We government made it possible so easy. We government made it possible so easy. We start sending our factories to various start sending our factories to various start sending our factories to various countries and Mexico is done. Countries and Mexico is done. Countries and Mexico is done unbelievably well.
Mexico is unbelievable, unbelievably well. Mexico is unbelievable, unbelievably well. Mexico is unbelievable. Its a mini version of whats going on. Its a mini version of whats going on. Its a mini version of whats going on in China. You look at Ford, you look at - so in China you look at Ford, you look at - so in China you look at Ford, you look at so many different companies, you look many different companies, you look many different companies, you look recently, I could name ten companies.
Just recently I could name ten companies just recently I could name ten companies just right off the bat. You look at carrier right off the bat, you look at carrier right off the bat, you look at carrier Air Conditioning, they closed right Air Conditioning, they closed right Air Conditioning. They closed right before my primary in Indiana.
They might before my primary in Indiana. They might before my primary in Indiana, they might have been responsible for the victory, have been responsible for the victory, have been responsible for the victory other than Bobby Knight. It was probably other than Bobby Knight, it was probably other than Bobby Knight.
It was probably more responsible than anybody, but - but we more responsible than anybody, but - but we more responsible than anybody. But - but we had a big victory in Indiana. Carriers had a big victory in Indiana. Carriers had a big victory in Indiana, carriers leaving Indiana going to Mexico, fired, leaving Indiana going to Mexico, fired, leaving Indiana going to Mexico, fired all that people.
So our middle class is all that people. So our middle class is all that people. So our middle class is shrunk ten percentage points since 1970, shrunk ten percentage points since 1970, shrunk ten percentage points since 1970 and chair of GDP controlled by workers and chair of GDP controlled by workers and chair of GDP controlled by workers has steadily declined and shifted To has steadily declined and shifted to - has steadily declined and shifted to corporations and the corporations are corporations and the corporations are corporations and the corporations are your special interest people.
Theyre your special interest people. Theyre your special interest people. Theyre your people with a lot of clout, theyre your people with a lot of clout. Theyre your people with a lot of clout. Theyre the people that give campaign the people that give campaign the people that give campaign contributions to Hillary Clinton.
These contributions to Hillary Clinton. These contributions to Hillary Clinton, these are the people, folks look, youre living, are the people, folks look, youre living, are the people folks look, youre living in a rigged system. I used to say it in a rigged system. I used to say it in a rigged system.
I used to say it about the primary because Id win a about the primary because Id win a about the primary because Id win a state and I didnt get the state and I didnt get the state and I didnt get the - I mean, Id win a State by a lot and the - I mean, Id win a state by a lot. And the - I mean, Id win a state by a lot and the delegates would go to somebody else, say, delegates would go to somebody else, say, delegates would go to somebody else, say, wait a minute, wait a minute, wait a minute.
I just won the state of Louisiana, how I just won the state of Louisiana, how I just won the state of Louisiana, how come the delegates are in mine? Well, it come - the delegates are in mine, well it come - the delegates are in mine. Well, it goes this way and that way, no, you dont goes this way and that way.
No, you dont goes this way. And that way, no, you dont understand, understand, understand. And I think I brought out a lot of the - and I think I brought out a lot of the - and I think I brought out a lot of the flaws because I - you know, people maybe flaws because I - you know, people maybe flaws because I - you know, People maybe they live with us for years, but Id win, they live with us for years, but Id win, they live with us for years.
But Id win states and all of a sudden I find out states and all of a sudden I find out states and all of a sudden I find out where are my delegates. And if I didnt, where are my delegates? And if I didnt, where are my delegates? And if I didnt win by massive numbers, because the win by massive numbers, because the win by massive numbers, because the systems wrecked look at Bernie Sanders systems wrecked.
Look at Bernie Sanders systems wrecked. Look at Bernie Sanders. Look, what happened to him with the look, what happened to him with the look what happened to him with the super-delegates, you know, the Republican super-delegates, you know the Republican super-delegates, you know the Republican system is just as bad, but its more system is just as bad.
But its more system is just as bad, but its more sophisticated because they dont use sophisticated because they dont use sophisticated because they dont use super-delegates. Super-delegates are too super-delegates, super-delegates are too super-delegates, super-delegates are too obvious. But Bernie Sanders with the obvious, but Bernie Sanders with the obvious, but Bernie Sanders with the super-delegates, I mean that whole deal super-delegates, I mean that whole deal super-delegates, I mean, that whole deal was also rigged.
And I think were gonna was also rigged. And I think were gonna was also rigged and I think were gonna get a lot of the - Bernie Sanders voters get a lot of the Bernie Sanders voters, get a lot of the Bernie Sanders voters because one thing we had in common is because one Thing we had in common is because one thing we had in common is not a lot, but he knew that trade deals, not a lot, but he knew that trade deals, not a lot, but he knew that trade deals were terrible.
And I know the trade deals were terrible and I know the trade deals were terrible and I know the trade deals are terrible. The difference is I can fix are terrible. The difference is I can fix are terrible. The difference is I can fix the trade deals and make them phenomenal the trade deals and make them phenomenal the trade deals and make them phenomenal.
You know, a couple of the people who the, you know, a couple of the people who the, you know a couple of the people who the Republican Party said, oh, gee! Trump is Republican Party said, oh, gee! Trump is Republican Party said, oh, gee! Trump is going against trade, Im not against going against trade, Im not against going against trade.
Im not against trade. I just want to make better deals. I trade, I just want to make better deals. I trade, I just want to make better deals. I think its great, I think having trade is think its great. I think having trade is think its great. I think having trade is great. I want to make better deal and - and great I want to make better deal and - and great I want to make better deal.
And - and Im always so amazed, Im always. So Im always so amazed, Im always. So Im always so amazed. Im always so amazed when I see somebody talking about amazed when I see somebody talking about amazed when I see somebody talking about, you know my viewpoints, my viewpoints are, you know my viewpoints.
My viewpoints are, you know my viewpoints. My viewpoints are very simple. I want great deals for this very simple. I want great deals for this very simple. I want great deals for this country. Somebody said, are you a free country? Somebody said, are you a free country? Somebody said are you a free trader?
The answer is yes. But to have trader the answer is yes, but to have trader the answer is yes. But to have free trade, you have to have smart people, free trade, you have to have smart people, free trade, you have to have smart people. We dont have smart people representing. We dont have smart people representing - we dont have smart people representing us or we have people that are controlled us or we have people that are controlled us or we have people that are controlled by the lobbyists and controlled by the - by the lobbyists and controlled by The - by the lobbyists and controlled by the special interests.
But yes, Im a free special interests, but yes, Im a free special interests. But yes, Im a free trader, but they say, well, how do you trader, but they say, well, how do you trader, but they say, well, how do you define your stance on training, one of define your stance on training, one of define your stance on training, one Of the reporters asked me this question a.
The reporters asked me this question a - the reporters asked me this question a few months ago and I said heres my few months ago and I said heres my few months ago and I said heres my stance on trading. I want to make great stance on trading. I want to make great stance on trading. I want to make great deals for the United States, call it fair deals for the United States, call it fair deals for the United States, call it fair trade, call it free trade, call it this trade, call it free trade, call it this trade, call it free Trade call it this ten different names, we can give it I ten different names, we can give it I ten different names we can give it.
I want to make great deals for the people want to make great deals for the people want to make great deals for the people of the United States. I want to bring our of the United States, I want to bring our of the United States. I want to bring our jobs back. I dont want companies leaving jobs back. I dont want companies leaving jobs back.
I dont want companies leaving because we dont know what were doing because we dont know what were doing because we dont know what were doing. And if companies leave and fire as in and if companies leave and fire as in and if companies leave and fire as in the case of carrier and so many others, the case of carrier and so many others, the case of carrier and so many others, theres Going to be consequences, theres going to be consequences, theres going to be consequences.
Theyre not going to make their air. Theyre not going to make their air. Theyre not going to make their air conditioners in Mexico, send them into conditioners in Mexico, send them into conditioners. In Mexico, send them into the United States, the United States, the United States, 1,400 people that are phenomenal people, 1,400 people that are phenomenal people, 1,400 people that are phenomenal people that help build that firm, send them into that help build that firm, send them into that Help build that firm, send them into the United States and theres no - the United States and theres no the United States and theres no consequence no.
Now theres a consequence, consequence no. Now theres a consequence, consequence no. Now theres a consequence. The consequence is theyre going to pay - the consequence is theyre going to pay. The consequence is theyre going to pay a 35 percent tax when that air a 35 percent tax when that air a 35 percent tax.
When that air conditioner comes into the country and conditioner comes into the country and conditioner comes into the country and heres whats going to happen one of two, heres whats going to happen. One of two, heres whats going to happen. One of two things, things, things, either theyre not going to move, which either theyre not going to move, which either theyre not going to move, which is mostly going to happen or if its too is mostly going to happen or if its too is mostly going to Happen or if its too late or they move because you want to late or they move because you want to late or they move because you want to look at their bottom line, their bottom look at their bottom line, their bottom look at their bottom line, their Bottom lines, much different, okay, and were lines much different, okay?
And were lines much different, okay? And were gonna have a strong border. When I got ta gonna have a strong border, when I got ta gonna have a strong border, when I got ta have a weak border, theyre gonna have to have a weak border. Theyre gonna have to have a weak border. Theyre gonna have to go through a strong strong border but go through a strong strong border but go through a strong, strong border.
But heres the difference. Were either gonna, heres the difference. Were either gonna, heres the difference. Were either gonna keep them here or were gonna make a - keep them here or were gonna make a - keep them here or were gonna make a hell of a lot of money. Its very simple hell of a lot of money.
Its very simple. Hell of a lot of money, its very simple and theyre gonna regret that they ever and theyre gonna regret that they ever and theyre gonna regret that they ever moved and were going to keep everybody moved and were going to keep everybody moved and Were going to keep everybody here.
Theyre not going to leave and Ive here, theyre not going to leave and Ive here, theyre not going to leave. And Ive watched over the years, Ive watched the watched over the years. Ive watched the watched over the years, Ive watched the government, our government, they dont government our government, they dont government our government, they dont have a clue.
They want to give - have a clue. They want to give - have a clue. They want to give interest-free loans. They want to give interest-free loans, they want to give interest-free loans, they want to give all sorts of deals they want. They dont all sorts of deals they want. They dont all sorts of deals they want.
They dont have a clue. A couple of cases I read have a clue. A couple of cases I read have a clue. A couple of cases I read about where they took the money and they about where they took the money and they about where they took the money and they left anyway left anyway left anyway. So they got cheap money and then they - so they got cheap money and then they - so they got cheap money and then they left because they didnt have good left because they didnt have good left because they didnt have good lawyers who didnt say like you have To lawyers who didnt say like you have to lawyers who didnt say like you have to stay, were giving your money stay so stay were giving your money stay so stay were giving your money stay.
So its very simple. They want to go to. Its very simple. They want to go to - its very simple, they want to go to another country to pay tax, to get their another country to pay tax, to get their another country to pay tax, to get their product back into. They could go the rest product back into - they could go the rest product back into they could go the rest of the world, they could do whatever they of the world they could do whatever they of the world they could do whatever they want and dont kid Yourself folks other want and dont kid yourself folks other want and dont kid yourself folks, other countries do that with us.
We have a free countries do that with us. We have a free countries do that with us. We have a free deal with China. They can put their stuff deal with China, they can put their stuff deal with China, they can put their stuff in no consequence, no tax, no, nothing in no consequence, no tax, no, nothing in no consequence, no tax, no, nothing try doing business with China.
I have a try doing business with China, I have a try doing business with China. I have a couple of friends here that are very couple of friends here that are very couple of friends here that are very much involved with New Hampshire. They much involved with New Hampshire, they much involved with New Hampshire, they love New Hampshire.
They cant get their love New Hampshire. They cant get their love New Hampshire. They cant get their product into China. And if they do get it product into China and if they do get it product into China and if they do get it into have to pay a massive tax, so you into have to pay a massive tax so you into have to pay a massive tax.
So you have to have a fair thing going on and have to have a fair thing going on and have to have a fair thing going on. And we dont have anything fair. Theres - we dont have anything fair. Theres - we dont have anything fair. Theres nothing fair. The real medium, the real - nothing fair, the real medium, the real - nothing fair.
The real medium, the real median earnings of male workers in median earnings of male workers in median earnings of male workers in America has decreased by almost a America has decreased by almost a America has decreased by almost a thousand dollars from 1973. To here I thousand dollars from 1973 to here I thousand dollars from 1973 to here.
I mean think of it, its hard to believe mean think of it. Its hard to believe mean think of it. Its hard to believe and the real median earnings of female and the real median earnings of female and the real median earnings of female workers in America has decreased by 1154. Workers in America has decreased by 1154 workers in America has decreased by 1154 dollars from 2007. To 2014, thats a short dollars from 2007 to 2014, thats a short dollars from 2007 to 2014. Thats a short period of time.
Median household incomes, period of time, median household incomes, period of time, median household incomes are now more than four are now more than four are now more than four thousand dollars less than they were in thousand dollars less than they were in thousand dollars less than they Were in 2000 before we opened our markets to 2000 before we opened our markets to 2000 before we opened our markets to China.
Hey, I give China a lot of credit. I China, hey, I give China a lot of credit. I China, hey, I give China a lot of credit. I have great relationships. I mean the have great relationships. I mean the have great relationships. I mean the largest bank in the world from China is largest bank in the world from China is largest bank in the world from China is a tenant of mine in one of my buildings, a tenant of mine in one of my buildings, a tenant of mine In one of my buildings, I do tremendous business with China, with I do tremendous business with China, with I do tremendous business with China, with condominiums.
I do business with Bank of condominiums. I do business with Bank of condominiums. I do business with Bank of America, which is one of the buildings I America, which is one of the buildings I America, which is one of the buildings I have in, in a partnership with another have in, in a partnership with another have in, in a partnership With another great company in San Francisco and 1290 great company in San Francisco and 1290 great company in San Francisco and 1290 Avenue of the America, one of the biggest Avenue of the America, one of the biggest Avenue of the America, one of the biggest office buildings In New York came office buildings in New York came office buildings in New York came directly and indirectly right through directly and indirectly right through directly and indirectly right through China.
From 1945 to 2001, our economy grew China from 1945 to 2001. Our economy grew China from 1945 to 2001. Our economy grew at an average rate of 3.5 %, okay, thats at an average rate of 3.5 %, okay, thats at an average rate of 3.5 %. Okay, thats not great. By the way, thats not great, if not great. By the way thats not great, if not great, by the way thats not great.
If China goes below 7 %, its like you know China goes below 7 %. Its like you know China goes below 7 %. Its like you know world scandal. They go to 7 %, just like world scandal, they go to 7 %, just like world scandal, they go to 7 %. Just like our - were bragging about 3.5 well now we - our - were bragging about 3.5. Well, now we - our - were bragging about 3.5. Well, now we have almost nothing after China joined, have almost nothing after China joined, have almost nothing after China joined the World Trade Organization, our growth, the World Trade Organization, our growth, the World Trade Organization, our growth rate has been cut in half and right now rate Has been cut in half and right now rate has been cut in half and right now our growth rate for the last quarter is our growth rate for the last quarter is our growth rate for the last quarter is down to practically zero down to practically zero Down to practically zero, its practically zero those days are - its practically zero those days are - its practically zero.
Those days are over the share of men. Heres something thats the share of men. Heres something thats the share of men. Heres something thats just sad. Just sad. Just sad the share of men in their prime, working the share of men in their prime, working the share of men in their prime working years and not working.
And theyre just years and not working. And theyre just years and not working and theyre just not working. Not working, not working so in their prime working is not working so in their prime working is not working. So in their prime working is not working, has nearly tripled since the late 1960s has nearly tripled since the late 1960s has nearly tripled since the late 1960s.
Think of that, I mean think of that as a think of that. I mean think of that as a think of that. I mean, think of that as a statement for our country, the trade statement for our country, the trade statement for our country, the trade policies of Hillary Clinton, global policies of Hillary Clinton, global policies of Hillary Clinton, global finance, ears.
And theyre all controlling finance, ears. And theyre all controlling finance, ears and theyre all controlling her. They have a hundred percent. They her, they have a hundred percent. They her, they have a hundred percent. They might as well stay on Hillary Clinton on might as well stay on Hillary Clinton on might as well stay on Hillary Clinton on their forehead.
They have total control their forehead. They have total control their forehead, they have total control of her. Thats why shes going to approve of her. Thats why shes going to approve of her. Thats why shes going to approve TPP. Just so you understand TPP, just so you understand TPP, just so you understand she totally approved, she wanted it.
So she totally approved, she wanted it, so she totally approved, she wanted it so badly. She said this is the gold badly. She said this is the gold badly. She said this is the gold standards of trading pacts. This is the standards of trading pacts. This is the standards of trading pacts. This is the gold standard.
Its all over television, gold standard. Its all over television, gold standard. Its all over television. Its all over and then all of a sudden its all over and then all of a sudden its all over. And then all of a sudden, she heard me make a speech saying whats she heard me make a speech saying whats she heard me make a speech saying whats wrong with TPP and she changed.
She said wrong with TPP and she changed, she said wrong with TPP and she changed, she said I no longer support it. So she went from I no longer support it. So she went from I no longer support it. So she went from the gold standard to - I dont support it the gold standard to - I dont support it the gold standard to - I dont support it because she didnt like what I was because she didnt like what I was because she didnt like what I was Saying so she went against it now, what saying so she went against it now, what saying so she went against it.
Now what happens is if she ever got in which happens is if she ever got in which happens is if she ever got in, which would be a sad sad day for our country would be a sad sad day for our country would be a sad sad Day for our country and our workers, especially theyll take and our workers, especially theyll take and our workers, especially theyll take a sentence.
That doesnt mean anything a sentence. That doesnt mean anything a sentence. That doesnt mean anything, make a little change, change a little, make a little change, change a little, make a little change, change a little comma here or there. And shell say now I comma here or there and shell say now I comma here or there.
And shell say now I can finally support it. Its wonderful can finally support it. Its wonderful can finally support it. Its wonderful and that will be worse than NAFTA signed and that will be worse than NAFTA signed and that will be worse than NAFTA signed by her husband that would be worse than by her husband that would be worse than by her husband that would be worse Than NAFTA that will make NAFTA look like a NAFTA that will make NAFTA look like a NAFTA that will make NAFTA look like a toy, okay, toy, okay, toy, okay, look like a toy.
So just remember I said look like a toy. So just remember I said look like a toy, so just remember I said it, hopefully we dont have to experience it. Hopefully we dont have to experience it. Hopefully we dont have to experience that, but she will sign it assures you that. But she will sign. It assures you that, but she will sign, it assures you here and sign it 100 % here and sign it 100 % here and sign it 100 %. The greatest danger yet is the TPP. The greatest danger yet is the TPP. The greatest danger yet is the TPP, another Hillary Clinton trade deal and another Hillary Clinton trade deal and another Hillary Clinton trade deal.
And thats it. Its going to happen. You know, thats it. Its going to happen. You know, thats it. Its going to happen. You know one of the things with TPP, the single one of the things with TPP, the single one of the things with TPP, the single biggest weapon used against us and to biggest weapon used against us and to biggest weapon used against us and to destroy our Companies is devaluation of destroy, our companies is devaluation of destroy, our companies is devaluation of currencies and the greatest ever at that currencies and the greatest ever at that currencies.
And the greatest ever at that is China, very smart, is China, very smart, is China very smart. Theyre like grand chess masters, they - theyre like grand chess masters. They - theyre like grand chess masters, they are and were like checker players but are - and were like checker players but are - and were like checker players but bad once they have done such a job on us.
Bad once they have done such a job on us bad once they have done such a job on us evaluation and NAFTA doesnt cover the evaluation and NAFTA doesnt cover the evaluation and NAFTA doesnt cover the subject. And Ive said if youre going to subject and Ive said if youre going to subject and Ive said if youre going to approve this TPP and if youre going to approve this TPP and if youre going to approve this TPP and if youre going to approve any Trade you have to cover, approve any trade, you have to cover, approve any trade, you have to cover currency manipulation because theres currency manipulation because theres currency manipulation because theres such tremendous currency manipulation, such tremendous currency manipulation, such tremendous currency manipulation.
Now TPP, its not mentioned, I wont tell now TPP, its not mentioned, I wont tell. Now TPP, its not mentioned. I wont tell you some of the people that went crazy, you - some of the people that went crazy, you some of the people that went crazy when they wanted to bring it in and put when they wanted to bring it in and put when they wanted to Bring it in and put it in because I went out and I actually it in because I went out and I actually it in because I went out and I actually did a radio ad for a group of people did a radio ad for a group of People did a radio ad for a group of people that love this country and they did an - that love this country and they did an - that love this country and they did an ad on currency manipulation.
How its not ad on currency manipulation, how its not ad. On currency manipulation, how its not covered by TPP and if you would have covered by TPP and if you would have covered by TPP and if you would have seen the people that were opposed to seen the people that were opposed to seen the people that were Opposed to that, what do we have to lose by having that, what do we have to lose by having that?
What do we have to lose by having it? Its like why are people upset that it? Its like why are people upset that it? Its like why are people upset that with free trade that Im - I like that I with free trade that Im - I like that I with free trade that Im - I like that I want to make better deals.
I said I want want to make better deals. I said I want want to make better deals. I said I want to make better deals with Mexico. I want to make better deals with Mexico. I want to make better deals with Mexico. I want to make better deals with China, does it to make better deals with China, does it to make better deals with China?
Does it all? Trump is messing with free trade? No. All Trump is messing with free trade. No, all Trump is messing with free trade. No, Im messing with bad deals that we can - Im messing with bad deals that we can - Im messing with bad deals that we can make good. I can make good deals, make good. I can make good deals, make good.
I can make good deals. Why would somebody fight them? I mean the - why would somebody fight them? I mean the - why would somebody fight them? I mean the US Chamber fights, they said all Trump US Chamber fights. They said all Trump US Chamber fights. They said all Trump wants to stop for each other. I dont wants to stop for each other.
I dont wants to stop for each other. I dont want to sell free trade. I left free want to sell free trade. I left free want to sell free trade. I left free trade, but I want to make great deals. I trade, but I want to make great deals. I trade but I want to make great deals. I want to take a deal thats faulty.
Well want to take a deal thats faulty. Well, want to take a deal thats faulty. Well, were losing hundreds and hundreds of - were losing hundreds and hundreds of - were losing hundreds and hundreds of billions of dollars a year. If I can make billions of dollars a year, if I can make billions of dollars a year, if I can make it good, isnt that a positive thing?
Okay, it good. Isnt that a positive thing? Okay, it good. Isnt that a positive thing? Okay. Thats something Bernie cant do. Hes - thats something Bernie cant do. Hes - thats something Bernie cant do. Hes right that theyre bad, but he wont be right that theyre bad. But he wont be right that theyre bad, but he wont be able to fix them.
Ill be able to fix, able to fix them, Ill be able to fix, able to fix them, Ill be able to fix them and we cant fix them. There are them and we cant fix them. There are them and we cant fix them. There are consequences. Again, we dont trade and consequences. Again, we dont trade and consequences.
Again, we dont trade and you know how long thatll last for about, you know how long thatll last for about, you know how long thatll last for about 24 hours before they come to the table. 24 hours before they come to the table 24 hours before they come to the table. But you have to be able to walk every, but you have to be able to walk every.
But you have to be able to walk every time if youre gonna make a good deal time. If youre gonna make a good deal time. If youre gonna make a good deal, you have to be able to walk John. Kerry, you have to be able to walk John, Kerry, you have to be able to walk, John. Kerry never walked from the Iran deal.
Its one never walked from the Iran deal. Its one never walked from the Iran deal. Its one of the most embarrassing deals Ive ever of the most embarrassing deals Ive ever of the most embarrassing deals Ive ever seen in my life to horrible deal, but seen in my life to horrible deal, but seen in my life to horrible deal.
But just as a deal, just as a deal, just as a deal, its an embarrassment he never walked he - its an embarrassment, he never walked he - its an embarrassment he never walked. He lost every single point. They get one, lost every single point. They get one lost every single point, they get one hundred and fifty billion dollars back, hundred and fifty billion dollars back, hundred and fifty billion dollars back.
They get everything. We never got our - they get everything. We never got our - they get everything. We never got our hostages, we got him when the deal was hostages, we got him when the deal was hostages, we got him when the deal was going to be signed, we should have had going to be signed, we should have had going to be signed.
We should have had those hostages year before we should those hostages year before we should those hostages year before we should have never agreed to a negotiation. We have never agreed to a negotiation. We have never agreed to a negotiation. We should have said no way we should have - should have said no way we should have - should have said no way we should have left the room and we should have said left the room and we should have said left the room and we should have said Guess what were doubling up your guess what were doubling up your guess what were doubling up your sanctions, they would have been back on sanctions, they would have been back on sanctions, they would have been back on the telephone.
Please come back please. The telephone, please come back please. The telephone, please come back. Please please please. We beg you come back and please please we beg you come back and please please we beg you come back and you know whats going to happen there. You know whats going to happen there, you know, whats going to happen there was was was the hostages would have been out years, the hostages would have been out years the hostages would have been out years ago.
So its just - its said and I just ago. So its just - its said and I just ago. So its just - its said and I just - you know I - I leave you with this because you know I - I leave you with this because you know I - I leave you with this because - and then were gonna take some questions and then were gonna take Some questions and then were gonna take some questions, but weve had some pretty good people, but weve had some pretty good people.
But weve had some pretty good people representing us over the years. Ill tell representing us over the years, Ill tell representing us over the years. Ill tell you, weve had some very, very great you weve had some very, very great you. Weve had some very, very great people. And let me tell you what they people.
And let me tell you what they people and let me tell you what they said about trade, because these are our said about trade because these are our said about trade because these are our finest ok and we also have a one other finest ok. And we also have a one other finest ok and we also have a one other thing I just want and I think I have to thing I just want and I think I have to thing I just want and I think I have to say this, we Have to immediately withdraw say this, we have to immediately withdraw say this.
We have to immediately withdraw from the trans-pacific partnership from the trans-pacific partnership from the trans-pacific partnership immediately. We cannot continue to go on immediately. We cannot continue to go on immediately. We cannot continue to go on. Its such a one-sided bad deal done by its such a one-sided bad deal done by.
Its such a one-sided bad deal done by the special interests. We have to address the special interests we have to address the special interests we have to address. We have to withdraw ok. We have and we we have to withdraw ok. We have and we we have to withdraw ok. We have and we should seek a guarantee from Hillary should seek a guarantee from Hillary should seek a guarantee from Hillary Clinton that she wont sign it and well Clinton that she wont sign it and well Clinton that she wont sign it and well make great trade Deals with people, I make great trade deals with people.
I make great trade deals with people. I want to make great deals, want to make great deals, want to make great deals. I like one-on-one deals. I dont like I like one-on-one deals. I dont like - I like one-on-one deals, I dont like massive numbers of countries where massive numbers of countries where massive numbers of countries where nobodys reading except them.
But we want nobodys reading except them. But we want nobodys reading except them. But we want one-on-one with countries that treat us one-on-one with countries that treat us one-on-one with countries that treat us properly and were going to treat them properly and were going to treat them properly and were going to treat them properly, appoint the toughest and properly appoint.
The toughest and properly appoint the toughest and smartest trade negotiators who will smartest trade negotiators who will smartest trade negotiators who will fight for the American worker thats fight for the American worker thats fight for the American worker. Thats what we have to do. We have no choice.
We what we have to do, we have no choice. We what we have to do, we have no choice. We have to do it. Direct Commerce Secretary have to do it, direct Commerce Secretary have to do it, direct Commerce Secretary. I will do that to identify every - I will do that to identify every - I will do that to identify every violation of trade agreements, then violation of trade agreements, then violation of trade agreements, then direct all agencies to use every direct all agencies to use every direct.
All agencies to use every available tool to end the abuse these available tool to end the abuse these available tool to end the abuse. These are abuses. These arent like, oh, gee! This are abuses. These arent like, oh, gee! This are abuses. These arent like, oh, gee! This is not quite working, these are abused is not quite working.
These are abused is not quite working. These are abused. They are abusing us, they are taking - they are abusing us, they are taking - they are abusing us. They are taking advantage of us because they think we advantage of us because they think we advantage of us because they think we are being led by very, very stupid.
People are being led by very, very stupid. People are being led by very, very stupid people. Believe me, these are abuses tell our - believe me, these are abuses, tell our - believe me, these are abuses, tell our NAFTA partners. We want to renegotiate NAFTA partners. We want to renegotiate NAFTA partners.
We want to renegotiate NAFTA, want to renegotiate, hey, we want a NAFTA want to renegotiate, hey, we want a NAFTA want to renegotiate, hey, we want a better deal, ok, better deal, ok, better deal. Ok. This includes dealing with the VAT on. This includes dealing with the VAT on. This includes dealing with the VAT on our goods Mexico instituted after we our goods Mexico instituted after we our goods Mexico instituted after we eliminated the tariff and improving, eliminated the tariff and improving - eliminated the tariff and improving worker protections.
In both countries, in worker protections in both countries, in worker protections in both countries, in both countries, if we dont get a better both countries, if we dont get a better both countries, if we dont get a better deal, we will withdraw under Article 2205 deal. We will withdraw under Article 2205 deal.
We will withdraw under Article 2205, very simple, very simple, very simple. We withdraw. I dont think well ever we withdraw. I dont think well ever we withdraw. I dont think well ever withdraw because if they ever thought we withdraw because if they ever thought we withdraw because if they ever thought we were going to withdraw, theyll give us - were going to withdraw.
Theyll give us - were going to withdraw. Theyll give us everything we want. As an example, we have everything we want. As an example, we have everything we want. As an example, we have a situation where some of the richest, a situation where some of the richest, a situation where some of the richest and biggest and most powerful countries and biggest and most powerful countries and biggest and most powerful countries in the world.
We protect. They only pay us in the world, we protect, they only pay us in the world. We protect, they only pay us a fraction of what it costs to protect a fraction of what it costs to protect a fraction of what it costs to protect them. I said they got ta pay up and we them, I said they got ta pay up and we them, I said they got ta pay up and we have to be prepared to with you.
I dont have to be prepared to with you. I dont have to be prepared to with you. I dont want to withdraw, but you have to always want to withdraw. But you have to always want to withdraw. But you have to always be prepared. You cant say, oh, gee, were be prepared. You cant say, oh, gee, were be prepared, you cant say, oh, gee, were never going to withdraw because theyre never going to withdraw because theyre never going to withdraw because theyre gonna say, well, were never going to gonna say, well, were never going to gon Na say, well, were never going to negotiate.
So Hillary Clinton said we negotiate. So Hillary Clinton said we negotiate. So Hillary Clinton said we will stay with our allies. We will never will stay with our allies. We will never will stay with our allies. We will never leave our elets, I think it sounds good, leave our elets I think it sounds good, leave our elets.
I think it sounds good, sounds wonderful except for one thing sounds wonderful except for one thing sounds wonderful except for one thing you cant make a deal because the Allies you cant make a deal because the Allies you cant make a deal because the Allies are now Going to say, well, listen to her are now going to say well listen to her are now going to say well listen to her.
Were never gonna leave now Ill tell were never gonna leave now Ill tell were never gonna leave. Now Ill tell you, there may be a point where we you - there may be a point where we you - there may be a point where we withdraw for two hours before we get a withdraw for two hours before we get a withdraw for two hours before we Get a phone call, okay, but you cant say were phone call, okay, but you cant say were phone call, okay.
But you cant say were never ever ever gonna leave. We protect never ever, ever gonna leave. We protect never ever, ever gonna leave. We protect Japan, we protect Germany, we protect Japan, we protect Germany, we protect Japan, we protect Germany, we protect South Korea, we protect Saudi Arabia, South Korea, we protect Saudi Arabia, South Korea, we protect Saudi Arabia.
Saudi Arabia has so much money. Its Saudi Arabia has so much money. Its - Saudi Arabia has so much money. Its - theres never been anything like it. Theres never been anything like it. Theres never been anything like it. They wouldnt be there for a month if we - they wouldnt be there for a month.
If we - they wouldnt be there for a month, if we didnt protect them, they will do, didnt protect them, they will do, didnt protect them, they will do whatever we want, whatever we want, whatever we want and we want to be fair to them. We want and we want to be fair to them, we want and we want to be fair to them.
We want to be fair to everybody, but they have to, to be fair to everybody, but they have to, to be fair to everybody, but they have to pay. We have these massive deficits. Were pay, we have these massive deficits. Were pay, we have these massive deficits. Were like a debtor nation. I told you 21 like a debtor nation.
I told you 21 like a debtor nation. I told you 21 trillion dollars very soon and were trillion dollars very soon and were trillion dollars very soon. And were protecting the world. This is in 30 and protecting the world. This is in 30 and. Protecting the world, this is in 30 and 40 and 50 years ago, folks, were living 40 and 50 years ago, folks.
Were living 40 and 50 years ago folks were living in a different time, instruct the in a different time, instruct the in a different time, instruct the Treasury secretary to label China, the Treasury secretary to label China, the Treasury secretary to label China, the currency manipulator, currency Manipulator, currency manipulator instruct US trade representatives to instruct US trade representatives to instruct US trade representatives to bring cases against Chinas unfair, bring cases against Chinas unfair bring cases against Chinas unfair subsidy behavior.
I mean they subsidize subsidy behavior. I mean they subsidize subsidy behavior. I mean, they subsidize all these people that go out. They come all these people that go out, they come all these people that go out, they come into our country and they kill our into our country and they kill our into our country and they kill our companies.
Look at whats happening with companies, look at whats happening with companies, look at whats happening with the steel, theyre dumping product, all the steel, theyre dumping product, all the steel, theyre dumping product all over the place. Theyre dumping, they are over the place theyre dumping, they are over the place theyre dumping, they are dumping so much product.
Our steel dumping so much product, our steel dumping so much product, our steel companies are getting killed. Im going companies are getting killed. Im going companies are getting killed. Im going to protect our steel workers. I know more to protect our steel workers. I know more to protect our steel workers.
I know more about steel workers than anybody thats about steel workers than anybody. Thats about steel workers than anybody. Thats ever run for office. These are great ever run for office. These are great ever run for office. These are great, great people. They are being killed just great people. They are being killed just great people.
They are being killed just like the workers Mike and the workers like the workers Mike and the workers like the workers Mike and the workers here are being just destroyed. They train here are being just destroyed. They train here are being just destroyed. They train their workers and then they lose their - their workers and then they lose their - their workers and then they lose their job.
Think of it. I mean how - how sad job think of it, I mean how - how sad job think of it. I mean how, how sad if China does not immediately stop, its if China does not immediately stop, its if China does not immediately stop its improper practices including theft of improper practices including theft of improper practices, including theft of trade secrets and intellectual property, trade secrets and Intellectual property, trade secrets and intellectual property that costs us millions and millions and that costs us millions and millions.
And that costs us millions and millions and millions of jobs and actually threatens millions of jobs and actually threatens millions of jobs and actually threatens the security of our country. I will use the security of our country. I will use the security of our country. I will use every lawful power to stop the cheating, every lawful power to stop the cheating, every lawful power to stop the cheating because thats what it is because thats what it is because thats what it is cheating including tariffs under Section cheating, including tariffs under Section Cheating including tariffs under Section 201 and 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 in 201 and 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 in 201 and 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 in Section 232 of the trade expansion Act Section 232 of the trade expansion Act Section 232 of the trade expansion Act of 1960 to trade expansion, huh?
Trade of 1960 to trade expansion, huh? Trade of 1960 to trade expansion, huh? Trade expansion for who? So I just wanted to go expansion for who. So I just wanted to go expansion for who. So I just wanted to go through a few of those points and you through a few of those points and you through a few of those points.
And you know there are so many things that we know there are so many things that we know there are. So many things that we could talk forever about trade, theres could talk forever about trade, theres could talk forever about trade. Theres nothing thats closer to my heart than nothing thats closer to my heart than nothing thats closer to my heart than trade.
Theres nothing thats closer to trade. Theres nothing thats closer to trade. Theres nothing thats closer to my heart actually than the workers that my heart actually than the workers that my heart actually than the workers that are being so badly hurt, so badly taken are being so badly hurt, so badly taken are being so badly hurt so badly.
Taken care of by what were doing and its care of by what were doing and its care of by what were doing. And its just not going to happen anymore when just not going to happen anymore when just not going to happen anymore. When you look back and you look at our great - you look back and you look at our great - you look back and you look at our great leaders, Abraham Lincoln said we have to leaders.
Abraham Lincoln said we have to leaders. Abraham Lincoln said we have to protect ourselves from goods pouring, protect ourselves from goods, pouring, protect ourselves from goods pouring into our country. We want to be a into our country. We want to be a into our country. We want to be a manufacturer. We want Goods pouring out manufacturer, we want Goods pouring out manufacturer, we want Goods pouring out of our country and we want to be paid of our country and we want to be paid of our country and we want to be paid for it.
George, Washington talked about it for it, George. Washington talked about it for it. George. Washington talked about it so many talked about it, the great ones. So many talked about it, the great ones. So many talked about it. The great ones talked about it. The ones we have today talked about it, the ones we have today talked about it, the ones we have today, they want to protect the rest of the - they want to protect the rest of the - they want to protect the rest of the world.
I think its almost as though they world, I think its almost as though they world. I think its almost as though they want to protect the world and they dont want to protect the world and they dont want to protect the world and they dont care about our workers and Hillary care about our workers and Hillary care about our workers and Hillary Clinton honestly, is one of the great Clinton, honestly, is one of the great Clinton, honestly, is one of the great abusers.
She doesnt understand the abusers. She doesnt understand the abusers. She doesnt understand the workers. She said recently a few months workers. She said recently a few months workers. She said recently a few months ago that she wants to put the miners out ago that she wants to put the miners out ago that she wants to put the miners out of business.
Essentially. She said I want of business essentially, she said I want of business essentially. She said I want to put the miners, Im going to put the - to put the miners, Im going to put the - to put the miners. Im going to put the miners out of business by the way, she miners out of business by the way, she miners out of business.
By the way, she didnt do too well in West Virginia. I didnt do too well in West Virginia. I didnt do too well in West Virginia. I dont imagine shes going to do too well. Dont imagine shes going to do too well. Dont imagine shes going to do too well. And if you look at Pennsylvania and if and if you look at Pennsylvania and if and if you look at Pennsylvania and if you look at some of the other places, you look at some of the other places, you look at some of the other places, Wyoming, Some of the other places, I cant - Wyoming, some of the other places, I cant, Wyoming, some of the other places, I cant a man who would vote for her.
She said I a man who would vote for her. She said I a man who would vote for her. She said I want to put the miners and the mines out, want to put the miners and the mines out, want to put the miners and the mines out of business who would vote for her. We of business who would vote for her we of business who would vote for her.
We want to put our people back to work, want to put our people back to work, want to put our people back to work. Were gonna put them back to work. Were gonna put them back to work. Were gonna put them back to work just just just were putting our people back to work. Were putting our people back to work, were putting our people back to work.
Thank you very much. Okay, how about a few? Thank you very much. Okay, how about a few? Thank you very much. Okay, how about a few questions from anybody? Yes, sir, go ahead. Questions from anybody. Yes, sir, go ahead. Questions from anybody. Yes, sir, go ahead. Yes, thank you. Thank you your comments.
Yes, thank you. Thank you your comments. Yes, thank you. Thank you. Your comments today on whats a very important issue today on whats a very important issue today on whats a very important issue to me as a manufacturing guy? Yes, good to me. As a manufacturing guy, yes, good to me. As a manufacturing guy, yes, good and you know cheap products are actually and you know cheap products are actually and you know cheap products are actually really very expensive and I believe really very expensive and I believe really very expensive and I believe people dont realize that Youre right, I - people dont realize that youre right.
I - people dont realize that. Youre right. I believe that theres a really simple believe that theres a really simple believe that theres a really simple answer. The best answers are the really answer the best answers are the really answer the best answers are the really simple answers. And youre a cultural simple answers and youre a cultural simple answers and youre a cultural leader.
Today. You aspire to be a leader today. You aspire to be a leader today, you aspire to be a political leader, but right now youre a political leader. But right now, youre a political leader. But right now, youre a cultural leader and you can use that cultural leader and you can use that cultural leader.
And you can use that position to create a cultural change and position to create a cultural change and position to create a cultural change. And its really simple take about an hour and its really simple take about an hour and its really simple take about an hour and it costs $ 0 and with that we can it costs $ 0 and with that we can it costs $ 0. And with that, we can restructure manufacturing in this restructure manufacturing in this restructure manufacturing in this country and bring back jobs and country and bring back jobs and country and bring back jobs and eliminate China as a source.
Its really eliminate China as a source. Its really eliminate China as a source. Its really dirty by the way. I dont want to dirty - by the way, I dont want to dirty by the way, I dont want to eliminate China. I want them to just eliminate China. I want them to just eliminate China. I want them to just treat us fairly forgot to eliminate John, treat us fairly forgot to eliminate John, treat us fairly forgot to eliminate John.
I want China to sell tremendous numbers. I want China to sell tremendous numbers. I want China to sell tremendous numbers of products and items to our countries of products and items to our countries of products and items to our countries. So 100 eliminated so and they cant. So 100 eliminated. So and they cant.
So 100 eliminated so - and they cant cheat us any longer. Theyre cheating. So cheat us any longer. Theyre cheating. So cheat us any longer. Theyre cheating. So when they - when they do their monetary, when they - when they do their monetary, when they - when they do their monetary manipulation, they manipulate they manipulation, they manipulate, they manipulation, they manipulate, they devalue.
When they do that devalue, when they do that devalue, when they do that, thats just killing us. Every time they - thats just killing us every time they - thats just killing us. Every time they do it, we lose jobs in this country, go do it. We lose jobs in this country, go do it. We lose jobs in this country, go ahead.
So - so I see that its up to us the ahead. So. So I see that its up to us the ahead. So - so I see that its up to us. The people we - the people we get to decide people, we - the people we get to decide people, we - the people we get to decide what to buy and if we have a cultural what to buy and if we have a cultural what to buy.
And if we have a cultural preference for purchasing the preference for purchasing the preference for purchasing the american-made manufactured product, then american-made manufactured product, then american-made manufactured product, then what that will do is it will create - what that will do is it will create what that will Do is - it will create demand for American products, so youre demand for American products, so youre demand for American products.
So youre right. Let me just tell you its a good right. Let me just tell you its a good right. Let me just tell you its a good point because in Japan and in China, they point because in Japan and in China, they point because in Japan and in China, they really want to buy products made in really want to buy products made in really want to Buy products made in Japan and in China whereas the United Japan and in China, whereas the United Japan and in China, whereas the United States we buy anything and our people, States, we buy anything.
And our people, States we buy anything and our people should have more pride in buying made in - should have more pride in buying, made in - should have more pride in buying made in the USA. Remember the old days we had the USA, remember the old days we had the USA, remember the old days we had made in America or made in the USA and made in America or made in the USA and made in America or made in the USA. And we should put that out.
I think Im gonna, we should put that out. I think Im gonna, we should put that out. I think Im gonna do that. We should put that on a product do that. We should put that on a product. Do that we should put that on a product made in the US. So, so thank you very much. So you know so, so thank you very much.
So you know so, so thank you very much. So you know there are countries that dont want to - there are countries that dont want to - there are countries that dont want to buy. You know, when we do business as an buy, you know when we do business as an buy, you know when we do business as an example with Japan, many friends in Japan, example with Japan, many friends in Japan, example with Japan, many friends in Japan, they know Its true they know they send, they know its true.
They know they send, they know its true. They know they send the cars, we send the beef a lot of times the cars we send the beef a lot of times the cars we send the beef a lot of times they send it back. We send things to them, they send it back. We send things to them, they send it back, we send things to them, they send it back, cant get it, cant they send it back, cant get it, cant they send it back, cant get it, cant pass certain tests, okay?
And its better pass certain tests, okay. And its better pass certain tests, okay, and its better product than what they have. They send it product than what they have. They send it product than what they have. They send it back. China sends things back. And I said back China sends things back. And I said back China sends things back and I said before they tax us, but they send it back before they tax us, but they send it back before they tax us.
But they send it back. Theyd rather send it back to Texas, but theyd rather send it back to Texas, but theyd rather send it back to Texas. But if we havent get it in what they did, if we havent get it in what they did, if we havent get it in what they did, look, what they did with Boeing build a look what they did with Boeing build a look what they did with Boeing build a plant, we get all of your, your plant, we get all of your, your plant, we get all of your - your information, we get everything, youve information, we get everything youve information we get everything youve ever worked for, for so many years for ever worked.
For - for so many years for ever worked for, for so many years for building airplanes, we gonna take this building airplanes, we gonna take this building airplanes, we gonna take this, were going to take that and South, were going to take that. And South, were going to take that and South Carolina, which is an amazing state that Carolina, which is an amazing state, that Carolina, which is an amazing state that I love so much and you look at the - I love so much and you look at the - I Love so much and you look at the entire Washington State area where they entire Washington State area where they entire Washington State area where they make so many Boeings be careful because make so many Boeings be careful because make so many Boeings be careful because theyre building Massive Boeing plants, theyre building massive Boeing plants, theyre building massive Boeing plants in China, massive and though and in - in China, massive and though and in - in China massive.
And though - and in addition to that, China is building their addition to that. China is building their addition to that. China is building their own plants, which is probably even a own plants, which is probably even a own plants, which is probably even a bigger problem. But they force Boeing to bigger problem, but they force Boeing to bigger problem.
But they force Boeing to build these massive plants and then all build these massive plants and then all build these massive plants. And then all of a sudden theyll do a devaluation and of a sudden theyll do a devaluation and of a sudden theyll do a devaluation. And another devaluation and Boeing will make another devaluation and Boeing will make another devaluation.
And Boeing will make 100 % of the airplanes not from South 100 % of the airplanes, not from South 100 % of the airplanes, not from South Carolina where they just moved. And built Carolina where they just moved and built Carolina where they just moved and built some incredible facilities, not from some incredible facilities, not from some incredible facilities, not from Washington State.
In the Seattle area, Washington State in the Seattle area, Washington State, in the Seattle area, theyre going to build from China and theyre going to build from China and theyre going to build from China and theyre going to do that by devaluing. Theyre going to do that by devaluing. Theyre going to do that by devaluing their currency.
And I tell the people of their currency and I tell the people of their currency and I tell the people of South Carolina actually, which was great. South Carolina actually, which was great, South Carolina actually, which was great to me, which was a big win for me, I said to me, which was a big win for me.
I said to me, which was a big win for me. I said be careful because thats whats be careful because thats whats be careful because thats whats happening as sure as youre sitting happening as sure as youre sitting happening as sure as youre sitting there. And in five years, youll say you there.
And in five years, youll say you there and in five years youll say, you know that Trump was right. Okay. Yes, sir, know that Trump was right. Okay. Yes, sir, know that Trump was right. Okay. Yes, sir, good 22 people. We had some of the finest good 22 people. We had some of the finest good 22 people. We had some of the finest tool and die makers in the country.
We tool and die makers in the country. We tool and die makers in the country. We had the latest technology, we spent a had the latest technology, we spent a had the latest technology, we spent a million dollars in equipment. It is million dollars in equipment. It is million dollars in equipment. It is myself my father.
It was my great uncle myself. My father, it was my great uncle myself, my father. It was my great uncle. We lost all of that to China and you - we lost all of that to China and you - we lost all of that to China and you know we were making police badges sacred know we were making police badges sacred know we were making police badges sacred.
Theyre all being made in China. Theyre all being made in China. Theyre all being made in China. All you have to do is type in all you have to do is type in all you have to do is type in police badges, California, China and its police badges, California, China and its police badges, California, China.
And its all there. I lost all that business. A all there, I lost all that business, a all there I lost all that business, a million dollars, million dollars, million dollars. I call my Congress people off, hey, I call my Congress people off, hey, I call my Congress people off, hey, theres something unfair here.
Theyre - theres something unfair here. Theyre - theres something unfair here. Theyre making this item 2/3 less than me making this item, 2/3 less than me making this item. 2/3 less than me. I said thats material costs. I went to - I said thats material costs. I went to - I said thats material costs.
I went to them. Ive got nothing from them at all. I them. Ive got nothing from them at all. I them. Ive got nothing from them at all. I so will have to retrain the workers for. So will have to retrain the workers for so will have to retrain the workers for what we had full blue cross. We had paid what we had full blue cross.
We had paid what we had full blue cross. We had paid vacations, we had 401ks, I used to be able vacations. We had 401ks, I used to be able vacations. We had 401ks. I used to be able to take a two-week vacation thats gone to take a two-week vacation thats gone to take a two-week vacation thats gone. What are you gonna do for us, okay.
So I - what are you gonna do for us? Okay. So I - what are you gonna do for us? Okay. So I think - I think first of all, your story is think - I think first of all, your story is think - I think first of all, your story is common to thousands and thousands of common to thousands. And thousands of common to thousands and thousands of companies throughout this country and in companies throughout this country and in companies throughout this country.
And in the end, what were going to do very the end, what were going to do very the end, what were going to do very easily is were going to make it. So when easily is were going to make it. So when easily is were going to make it. So when somebody country, when they currency, somebody country when they currency, somebody country when they currency manipulate, when they devalue their manipulate, when they devalue their manipulate, when they devalue their currency, which as you know makes it currency, which as you know makes it currency, which as You know, makes it impossible to compete.
Its costing us a impossible to compete. Its costing us a impossible to compete. Its costing us a fortune folks. You know, it sounds good fortune folks, you know, it sounds good. Fortune folks, you know, it sounds good, but of course because we lose all those, but of course because we lose all those.
But of course because we lose all those jobs and youre better off paying 10 % jobs and youre better off paying 10 % jobs. And youre better off paying 10 % more, 15 % more for the badges or whatever, more, 15 % more for the badges or whatever, more, 15 % more for the badges or whatever they may be. And all of these people are - they may be - and all of these people are - they may be - and all of these people are still working.
Its cheaper for our still working. Its cheaper for our still working. Its cheaper for our country. We make its very profitable for country. We make - its very profitable for country. We make - its very profitable for our country now. We dont play the game our country now. We dont play the game our country now.
We dont play the game the way they play the game. They play the - the way they play the game, they play the - the way they play the game, they play the game to win. We play the game in this game to win. We play the game in this game to win. We play the game in this country to survive. Were gonna start country to survive.
Were gonna start country to survive. Were gonna start playing the game to win, so just hang in playing the game to win. So just hang in playing the game to win. So just hang in there. I know its not easy but hang in there. I know its not easy but hang in there. I know its not easy, but hang in there, man, hang in so sad and what you there man, hang in.
So sad and what you there man, hang in so sad and what you just said, thousands and thousands of just said thousands and thousands of just said thousands and thousands of companies in our country. Thank you. All right. So when you talk about - all right, so when you talk about all right. So when you talk about countering this kind of globalism effort, countering this kind of globalism effort, countering this kind of globalism effort with bringing more profits back to the - with bringing more profits back to the - with bringing more profits back to the United States.
Although that seems very United States, although that seems very United States, although that seems very good for small business in the middle, good for small business in the middle, good for small business in the middle class. How do you plan on dealing with a class? How do you plan on dealing with a class?
How do you plan on dealing with a corporate backlash for larger companies, corporate backlash for larger companies, corporate backlash for larger companies who can make a much larger profit when who can make a much larger profit? When who can make a much larger profit when they are ex, when theyre - you dont have - they are ex, when theyre - you dont have - they are ex when theyre - you dont have a lot of backlashes.
And you know, youre a lot of backlashes and you know youre a lot of backlashes and you know, youre gonna have a backlash where maybe people gonna have a backlash where maybe people gonna have a backlash where maybe people are gonna move from. New Hampshire, but are gonna move from New Hampshire but are gonna move from New Hampshire, but theyre not gonna move out to Mexico and theyre not gonna move out to Mexico and theyre not gonna move out to Mexico and theyre not gon Na move out that they can - theyre not gonna move out that they can.
Theyre not gonna move out that they can move to another state like with carrier move to another state like with carrier move to another state like with carrier carrier might move to another state carrier might move to another state carrier might move to another state. Plenty to choose from and this way you plenty to choose from and this way you plenty to choose from and this way you can really do your own thing can really do your own thing, can really do your own thing.
Corporations, Im not worried about it corporations. Im not worried about it. Corporations, Im not worried about it. Dont forget my tax plan is cutting. Dont forget my tax plan is cutting. Dont forget my tax plan is cutting business taxes way down and cutting business taxes way down and cutting business taxes way down and cutting taxes for middle income and everybody taxes for middle income and everybody taxes for middle income and everybody way down.
And were going to have a over way down and were going to have a over way down and were going to have a - over the next 2-3 weeks, were going to have a - the next 2-3 weeks. Were going to have a - the next 2-3 weeks, were going to have a very, very highly sophisticated tax plan, very, very highly sophisticated tax plan, very, very highly sophisticated tax plan done with some of the best people, the done with some of the best people.
The done with some of the best people, the best economists, the best minds in the best economists, the best minds in the best economists, the best minds in the world for it. Were going to really have world for it. Were going to really have world for it. Were going to really have some plan coming up.
We put the rudiments some plan coming up. We put the rudiments some plan coming up. We put the rudiments in and the real rudiment is were going in and the real rudiment is were going in and the real rudiment is were going to simplify our tax code number one and to simplify our tax code, number one. And to simplify our tax code, number one, and were going to cut the hell out of taxes.
Were going to cut the hell out of taxes. Were going to cut the hell out of taxes with a highest taxed or just about the - with a highest taxed or just about the - with a highest taxed or just about the highest tax nation in the world and our highest tax nation in the world. And our highest tax nation in the world and our businesses cant compete with other businesses, cant compete with other businesses, cant compete with other businesses for that reason also.
So were businesses for that reason also. So were businesses for that reason also. So were going to make it where the corporations going to make it, where the corporations going to make it where the corporations want to come back. And part of the reason want to come back and part of the reason want to come back.
And part of the reason and part of the problem that and part of the problem that and part of the problem that corporations have in all fairness is corporations have in all fairness is corporations have in all fairness is they have to pay so much tax. We have - I - they have to pay so much tax we have, I - they have to pay so much tax.
We have I think five trillion, but they say two and think five trillion, but they say two and think five trillion, but they say two and a half trillion. And I think its a much a half trillion and I think its a much a half trillion. And I think its a much higher number than that outside of this higher number than that.
Outside of this higher number than that, outside of this country where corporations have this country where corporations have this country where corporations have this money, they cant get it in because the money, they cant get it in because the money they cant get it in. Because the taxes are so high and because the taxes are so high and because the taxes are so high and because the bureaucracy is just as bad as the taxes, bureaucracy is just as bad as the taxes bureaucracy is just as bad as the taxes.
So companies - corporate inversions, so companies, corporate inversions, so companies, corporate inversions, companies are actually leaving. The companies are actually leaving. The companies are actually leaving the United States and going to other United States and going to other United States and going to other countries to pick up their money because countries to pick up their money because countries to pick up their money because they cant get their Money in and that they cant get their money in and that they cant get their money in and that money could be used to rebuild the money could be used to rebuild the money, could be used to rebuild the United States.
Youre talking about United States, youre talking about United States, youre talking about trillions of dollars. So all of these trillions of dollars, so all of these trillions of dollars. So all of these things are covered by me and I have to - things are covered by me and I have to - things are covered by me and I have to say the Democrats and the Republicans say the Democrats and the Republicans say the Democrats and the Republicans For years, all agree on this, whats for years, all agree on this, whats for years, all agree on this.
Whats - whats not to agree with, were going to - whats not to agree with, were going to - whats not to agree with, were going to bring our money into the United States, bring our money into the United States, bring our money into the United States. Trillions of doll - trillions of doll, trillions of doll we bring it into the United States, right?
We bring it into the United States, right? We bring it into the United States, right? I dont really need those notes because I dont really need those notes because I dont really need those notes because I dont need notes. I dont need notes. I dont need notes. Were not lucky that I dont need Arnel.
Were not lucky that I dont need Arnel. Were not lucky that I dont need Arnel. I can draw my way wrong. I can draw my way wrong. I can draw my way wrong. Nice, nice to have that ability. Isnt it nice, nice to have that ability, isnt it nice, nice to have that ability. Isnt it - its a good ability to have anyway, its a good ability to have anyway.
Its a good ability to have anyway, but we will do things that are going to, but we will do things that are going to - but we will do things that are going to be so miraculous and itll be fast. It be so miraculous and itll be fast. It be so miraculous and itll be fast, it wont take a long period of time and you wont take a long period of time and you wont take a long period of time.
And you know when China who I have a great know when China who I have a great know when China, who I have a great relationship with China, made a lot of relationship with China, made a lot of relationship with China, made a lot of money with China, you can make money with money with China, you can make money with money with China, you can make money with China.
Its hard to believe as a citizen China, its hard to believe as a citizen China, its hard to believe as a citizen looking at what theyve done to us, but looking at what theyve done to us, but looking at what theyve done to us. But we can make a lot of money with China. We can make a lot of money with China.
We can make a lot of money with China. I love having open Marxs returnin and I love having open Marxs returnin and I love having open Marxs returnin. And when they know that theyre going to be when they know that theyre going to be - when they know that theyre going to be consequences for their cheating, theyre consequences for their cheating.
Theyre consequences for their cheating. Theyre not going to do what they are doing, not going to do what they are doing, not going to do what they are doing. Ill give you an example. Theyre - Ill give you an example. Theyre - Ill give you an example. Theyre building right now. One of the largest building right now, one of the largest building right now, one of the largest military fortresses in the world in the military fortresses in the world, in the military fortresses in the world, in the South China Sea.
Now theyre taking our South China Sea. Now theyre taking our South China Sea now theyre taking our money. Theyre taking our jobs, theyre money, theyre taking our jobs, theyre money, theyre taking our jobs, theyre taking our pride or pride and theyre taking our pride or pride and theyre taking our pride or pride and theyre violating everything there is to violate, violating everything there is to Violate violating everything there is to violate by building this massive fortress in the - by building this massive fortress in the - by building this massive fortress in the South China Sea.
And unlike us, they dont South China Sea and unlike us they dont South China Sea. And unlike us, they dont get environmental impact permanence by. Get environmental impact permanence by get environmental impact permanence, by the way they say, build it, they saw it the way they say, build it. They saw it the way they say, build it.
They saw it work. The following hour. We say, build work the following hour. We say build work the following hour, we say build something, they start work 12 years from something they start work 12 years from something they start work 12 years from now or does it ever happen okay now or does it ever happen okay now or does it Ever happen, okay.
Can you imagine that theyre building an - can you imagine that theyre building an - can you imagine that theyre building an island? They took - they have the biggest island they took. They have the biggest island they took. They have the biggest excavators in the world sitting out in excavators in the world, sitting out in excavators in the world, sitting out in the sea, ripping the hell out of the the sea, ripping the hell out of the the sea, ripping the hell out of the Ocean out of the sea, ripping the hell ocean out of the sea, ripping the hell ocean out of the sea, ripping the hell out of it.
And they dont say like, oh, gee out of it. And they dont say like, oh, gee out of it. And they dont say like, oh, gee, we have to file for an environmental, we have to file for an environmental, we have to file for an environmental impact permit. They just do what they do impact permit. They just do what they do impact permit.
They just do. What they do thats because they dont respect us, thats because they dont respect us, thats because they dont respect us. Thats why they do it. They have no, thats why they do it. They have no - thats why they do it. They have no respect for a leader. They have no respect for a leader.
They have no respect for a leader. They have no respect for our country, a very, very respect for our country, a very, very respect for our country, a very, very important man than the world of politics, important man than the world of politics, important man than the world of politics and well beyond politics Said to me and well beyond politics said to me and well beyond politics said to me, Donald, I totally disagreed with your Donald.
I totally disagreed with your Donald. I totally disagreed with your talk. You know because Ive had this talk, you know, because Ive had this talk, you know, because Ive had this tough stance for a while long time, tough stance for a while long time, tough stance for a while long time, pretty a long time.
If you go back, its pretty a long time. If you go back, its pretty a long time. If you go back, its actually years many years. But he said I actually years many years, but he said I actually years many years. But he said, I really disagreed your tough talk on really disagreed, your tough talk on really disagreed, your tough talk on and Saudi Arabia and all these countries and Saudi Arabia and all these countries and Saudi Arabia and all these countries paying us, paying us paying us.
And I paying us paying us - paying us and I paying us paying us paying us. And I totally disagreed except for one thing totally disagreed except for one thing totally disagreed except for one thing Ive been called by. All of these, Ive been called by all of these, Ive been called by all of these countries, how do we settle up with Trump countries, how do we settle up with Trump countries, how do we settle up with Trump?
How do we make Trump like this? How do we - how do we make Trump like this? How do we - how do we make Trump like this? How do we do it? How do we do it now? Im not saying do it - how do we do it now? Im not saying do it - how do we do it now, Im not saying that in a braggadocious what Im just that in a braggadocious what Im just that in a braggadocious what Im just saying thats the way life is saying thats the way life is saying.
Thats the way life is. There are no repercussions right now at - there are no repercussions right now at - there are no repercussions right now at all for what all of these countries are all for what all of these countries are all for what all of these countries are doing to our countries. To our jobs, to doing to our countries, to our jobs, to doing to our countries, to our jobs, to our workers, none the story that you just - our workers, none the story that you just - our workers, none the story that you just told.
I mean there are none and your told, I mean there are none and your told, I mean there are none and your congressmen are all all these caught congressmen are all all these caught congressmen are all all these caught people in the Senate, people in Congress, people In the Senate, people in Congress, people in the Senate, people in Congress, a congressman, I know everyone and some a congressman.
I know everyone and some a congressman. I know everyone and some are really fine people and some arent, are really fine. People and some arent - are really fine people and some arent and some senators are really fine. People and some senators are really fine. People and some senators are really fine people and some arent, but many of them are and some arent.
But many of them are and some arent, but many of them are totally owned by and taken care of by totally owned, by and taken care of, by totally owned, by and taken care of, by lobbyists and special interests because lobbyists and special interests, because lobbyists and Special interests because a friend of mine said how could the a friend of mine said, how could the a friend of mine said, how could the United States allow ideal like so-and-so United States allow ideal like so-and-so United States allow ideal like so-and-so to happen.
And I said because the special to happen and I said because the special to happen and I said because the special interests take care of him, my friend interests, take care of him, my friend interests, take care of him, my friend whos very smart and very successful. But whos very smart and very successful, but whos very smart and very successful, but very naive, couldnt believe that anybody very naive, couldnt believe that anybody very naive, couldnt believe that anybody.
So he said theyre stupid. I said no. So he said theyre stupid. I said no. So he said theyre stupid. I said no, theyre not stupid. Theyre totally - theyre not stupid. Theyre totally - theyre not stupid. Theyre totally controlled by their lobbyists and controlled by their lobbyists and controlled by their lobbyists.
And theyre totally controlled by the - theyre totally controlled by the - theyre totally controlled by the special interests and when its campaign, special interests and when its campaign, special interests and when its campaign season millions and millions of dollars, season millions and millions of dollars season millions and Millions of dollars are given to some of these people and are given to some of these people and are given to some of these people and its so simple, do I know the system well, its so simple, do I know the system well, its so simple.
Do I know the system well, ok, how about one more question? Thats it. Ok. How about one more question? Thats it. Ok. How about one more question? Thats it. Go ahead you want to talk? Hello, thats go ahead. You want to talk? Hello, thats go ahead. You want to talk hello, thats right, get that mic right, get that mic right, get that mic, get that mic over there.
Mike, can I hold - get that mic over there? Mike, can I hold - get that mic over there? Mike? Can I hold it? Yeah, let him hold it. Let him hold it. See theres a man. Theres the man that see theres a man. Theres the man that see theres a man. Theres the man that knows what he wants. Thats my kind of knows what he wants.
Thats my kind of knows what he wants. Thats my kind of guy. Guy, guy go ahead. Well this you this might shock go ahead. Well this you this might shock go ahead. Well this you this might shock you, but we have something in common good you. But we have something in common good you, but we have something in common.
Good respect for human life. Thank you. Okay. No respect for human life. Thank you. Okay. No respect for human life. Thank you. Okay. No, I have two comments on my deep respect. I have two comments on my deep respect. I have two comments on my deep respect for human life, okay, number one and you for human life, okay, number one and you for human life, okay, number one and you can comment on my objections number one can comment on my objections.
Number one can comment on my objections, number one and number two, okay. Number one, Im and number two, okay. Number one, Im and number two, okay. Number one, Im opposed to the murder of unborn babies opposed to the murder of unborn babies opposed to the murder of unborn babies being legal, number two being legal, number two being legal.
Number two, Im opposed to are wasting military in, Im opposed to are wasting military in. Im opposed to are wasting military in the Middle East on behalf of Zionist, the Middle East on behalf of Zionist, the Middle East on behalf of Zionist Israel. Thank you. All right. Well, let me - Israel, thank you.
All right. Well, let me - Israel, thank you. All right. Well, let me just tell you that Israel is a very, very - just tell you that Israel is a very, very - just tell you that Israel is a very, very important ally of the United States and important ally of the United States and important ally of the United States and we are going to protect them 100 %, 100 %. We are going to protect them 100 %, 100 %. We are going to protect them 100 %, 100 %. Theyve been our most reliable.
Its our - theyve been our most reliable. Its our - theyve been our most reliable, its our true friend over there and we are going true friend over there and we are going true friend over there and we are going to protect Israel 100 % as to number one to protect Israel 100 % as to Number one, to protect Israel 100 % as to number one, we all were with you, okay?
We all were with you, okay? We all were with you. Okay, one more we got to ask one more because one more we got to ask one more because one more we got to ask one more because that was a tough question on Israel. That was a tough question on Israel. That was a tough question on Israel, right? That was nasty, right?
That was nasty, right? That was nasty, whoa. Are we all for Israel, right, man? Whoa? Are we all for Israel, right? Man? Whoa? Are we all for Israel? Right, man? Okay, go ahead. Lets go thank you very. Okay, go ahead. Lets go - thank you very. Okay, go ahead. Lets go - thank you very much. Okay, were for America too.
I agree much. Okay, were for America too. I agree much. Okay, were for America too. I agree. I would say that most of us here read, I would say that most of us here read. I would say that most of us here read out of the same economic PlayBook as you out of the same economic PlayBook as you out of the same economic PlayBook.
As you right, most of us are probably right. Most of us are probably right. Most of us are probably self-employed, so we agree wholeheartedly, self-employed. So we agree wholeheartedly, self-employed. So we agree wholeheartedly. What I would like in front of these, what I would like in front of these, what I would like in front of these cameras once and for all cameras once and for all cameras once and for all please put to bed that you will adhere.
Please put to bed that you will adhere please put to bed that you will adhere to and follow the United States to and follow the United States to and follow the United States Constitution is your compass for Constitution, is your compass for Constitution? Is your compass for governance, okay, by the way, hundred governance, okay, by the way, hundred governance, okay, by the way, hundred percent.
I love the question or the percent I love the question or the percent. I love the question or the statement in this case. But 100 percent statement in this case, but 100 percent statement in this case. But 100 percent. You know during the primaries where you know during the primaries where you know during the primaries where meet everybody very easily that was meet everybody very easily.
That was meet everybody. Very easily that was sometimes said, will he follow the, sometimes said, will he follow the, sometimes said, will he follow the Constitution folks? One of the great Constitution folks, one of the great Constitution folks, one of the great, great instruments ever written ever great instruments ever written, ever great instruments ever written, ever conceived, conceived, conceived, were with the Constitution 100 %, okay.
So were with the Constitution 100 %, okay. So were with the Constitution 100 %, okay. So - and you think Hillary Clinton would ever and you think Hillary Clinton would ever and you think Hillary Clinton would ever do a news conference like this totally do a news conference like this totally do a news conference like this totally unvetted.
And by the way, speaking of unvetted and by the way, speaking of unvetted and by the way, speaking of unvetted, were gonna take care of our unvetted, were gonna take care of our unvetted, were gonna take care of our vets. Just remember that ow my al al is I vets just remember that ow my al al is I vets just remember that ow my al al is - I met Alan, New Hampshire.
I always say hes met Alan, New Hampshire. I always say hes met Alan, New Hampshire. I always say hes one of the most loyal people Ive ever, one of the most loyal people Ive ever - one of the most loyal people Ive ever known, known, known. He loves the vets. He fights for the vets. He loves the vets.
He fights for the vets. He loves the vets. He fights for the vets. He went to everybodys speeches during - he went to everybodys speeches during - he went to everybodys speeches during the New Hampshire, primary and even the New Hampshire primary and even the New Hampshire primary and even before and all of a sudden, I noticed he before and all of A sudden I noticed he before and all of a sudden I noticed he was at mine more and more and I said who was at mine more and more and I said who was at mine more and more.
And I said who is this guy and hes an unbelievable, is this guy and hes an unbelievable, is this guy and hes an unbelievable veteran, respected by the veterans, more veteran, respected by the veterans, more veteran, respected by the veterans more than anybody. I know we have the guys than anybody. I know we have the guys than anybody.
I know we have the guys with the fancy suits and the ties that with the fancy suits and the ties that with the fancy suits and the ties that get the big consulting money. This is the get the big consulting money. This is the get the big consulting money. This is the guy thats respected, more than anybody I guy thats respected more than anybody I guy thats respected more than anybody I know and stand-up and after after a know and stand-up and after after a know and stand-up and after after a couple of months of Listening to couple of months of listening to couple of months of listening to everybody else on both sides, Democrat, everybody else on both sides, Democrat, everybody else on both sides, Democrat and Republican.
He came to us, he said, and Republican, he came to us, he said, and Republican, he came to us. He said theres nobody thats going to take care. Theres nobody thats going to take care. Theres nobody thats going to take care of the vets like you. And I want to come of the vets like you and I want to come of the vets like you and I want to come on board and he is the most amazing guy on board.
And he is the most amazing guy on board and he is the most amazing guy. And Ill tell you what, hes one of the - and Ill tell you what hes one of the - and Ill tell you what hes - one of the great things thats happened to me, great things thats happened to me, great things. Thats happened to me because we formulated plans and done because we formulated plans and done because we formulated plans and done things that hes taken back to large things that hes taken back to large things that hes taken back to large groups of veterans.
And we have plans, groups of veterans and we have plans, groups of veterans and we have plans that are better than any plans ever that are better than any plans ever that are better than any plans ever submitted. And its going to work well submitted and its going to work well submitted and its going to work well for the vets work well for the country, for the vets work well for the country, for the vets work well for the country and were going to be Proud that we take and were going to be proud that we take and were going to be proud that we take care of our veterans.
Are they gonna be care of our veterans? Are they gonna be care of our veterans? Are they gonna be proud of our country again? Oh, thank you, proud of our country again. Oh, thank you proud of our country again. Oh, thank you. Okay. Thank all the women are Zilly, right. Okay, thank all the women are Zilly, right.
Okay, thank all the women are Zilly right. The women like me, I dont know. I see by the women like me, I dont know. I see by the women like me, I dont know. I see by the way thank you. Yes, go ahead. I would the way - thank you. Yes, go ahead. I would the way - thank you. Yes, go ahead. I would like to tell you like to tell you, like to tell you, I want to thank you first of all for - I want to thank you first of all for - I want to thank you.
First of all, for everything youve done for the veterans, everything youve done for the veterans, everything youve done for the veterans, we all in the VFW know what youve done. We all in the VFW know what youve done. We all in the VFW know what youve done even if you dont come out and say it ok, even if you dont come out and say it ok, even if you dont come out and say it ok very much.
We appreciate it. But just to very much, we appreciate it, but just to very much we appreciate it, but just to mix quickly, homeland security and jobs mix, quickly, homeland security and jobs mix quickly, homeland security and jobs, why arent we putting our retiree? Our - why arent we putting our retiree, our - why arent we putting our retiree, our military retirees on that border or in military retirees on that border or in military retirees on that border or in TSA, get rid of all these hid Hebe TSA, get rid of all These hid Hebe TSA get rid of all these hid, Hebe jobbies, they wear at TSA, in them myself, jobbies, they wear at TSA, in them myself, jobbies, they wear at TSA, in them myself.
We need the veterans back in there to - we need the veterans back in there to - we need the veterans back in there to take it. They fought for this country and take it. They fought for this country and take it. They fought for this country and defended it, theyll still do it. Ok, thank defended it. Theyll still do it.
Ok, thank defended it. Theyll still do it. Ok, thank you. You know and we are looking at that. You, you know, and we are looking at that. You you know and we are looking at that and we are looking at that, were looking and we are looking at that, were looking and we are looking at that. Were looking at a lot of things.
I have to tell you as at a lot of things. I have to tell you as at a lot of things, I have to tell you as long as you bring it up though in terms long as you bring it up though in terms long as you bring it up though in terms of the border, some great People and now of the border, some great people and now of the border some great people and now you know this, we were endorsed.
I was you know this, we were endorsed. I was - you know this we were endorsed, I was endorsed by 16,500 Border Patrol agents endorsed by 16,500 Border Patrol agents endorsed by 16,500 Border Patrol agents. These are the people that take care of. These are the people that take care of. These are the people that take care of the border and first time theyve ever the border and first time theyve ever the border.
And first time theyve ever endorsed in the history of the Union or endorsed in the history of the Union or endorsed in the history of the Union or the group. Its the first time theyve the group. Its the first time theyve the group. Its the first time theyve ever endorsed a presidential candidate ever endorsed a presidential candidate ever endorsed a presidential candidate.
And I dont even know if theyre - and I dont even know if theyre - and I dont even know if theyre supposed to be doing it. And they said we supposed to be doing it and they said we supposed to be doing it and they said we dont even care at this point, dont even care at this point, dont even care at this point.
Its 16,500 incredible people out these - its 16,500 incredible people out these - its 16,500 incredible people out. These are incredible people that want to do are incredible people that want to do are incredible people that want to do their job. Its easier for them not to do their job. Its easier for them not to do their job.
Its easier for them not to do their job, but they want to do their job, their job, but they want to do their job, their job. But they want to do their job and so I was really honored by that. And and so I was really honored by that. And and so I was really honored by that. And I was also, as you know, endorsed by - I was also, as you know, endorsed by - I was also, as you know, endorsed by Sheriff Joe from Arizona, who whos had Sheriff Joe from Arizona, who whos had Sheriff Joe from Arizona who - whos had some great victories Lately, so Sheriff, some great victories lately, so Sheriff, some great victories lately.
So Sheriff, Joe is great. So were gonna do a job, Joe, is great. So were gonna do a job, Joe, is great. So were gonna do a job just in finishing just before I came up just in finishing, just before I came up just in finishing, just before I came up, I was told I was told I was told rasmussen one of the most highly rasmussen, one of The most highly rasmussen, one of the most highly respected polls just came out, were four respected polls just came out, were four respected polls just came out.
Were four points ahead. So thats okay. Were four points ahead. So thats okay. Were four points ahead. So thats okay. Were four points ahead, so were gonna have points ahead. So were gonna have points ahead. So were gonna have something, I think thats going to be something I think thats going to be something I think thats going to be very exciting.
